Rhode Island statutes. Title 34 Property
Chapter 33 Innkeepers’ Liens

34-33-1.
Lien on baggage and property of guests.

Every hotelkeeper or innkeeper shall be entitled to a lien upon, and may detain, the baggage, goods, chattels, and property of a guest brought upon his or her premises for the proper charges due from the guest on account of his or her accommodation, board and lodging and for all extras furnished at the request of the guest, and for all moneys advanced or credit extended to the guest by the hotelkeeper or innkeeper.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 710, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

34-33-1

.

34-33-2.
Sale of goods — Notice.

Any hotelkeeper or innkeeper who shall have a lien for accommodation, board and lodging or extras upon any baggage, goods, chattels, or property as provided in §

34-33-1

, or who, for a period of six (6) months shall have in his or her custody any unclaimed trunk, box, valise, package or parcel, or other chattel property, may sell the property at public auction to the highest bidder for cash and out of the proceeds of the sale may retain the expense of storage, advertisement, and sale thereof, as well as the amount of lien, if any; provided, however, that not less than fifteen (15) days prior to the date of the sale, a notice designating the time and place of the sale, and containing a brief general description of the goods, baggage, or articles to be sold, shall be published in a newspaper published in the city or town in which the hotel or inn is situated, and if there is no newspaper published in the city or town, then in a newspaper published in the county where the hotel or inn is situated; and provided, further, that if the name and address of the guest or owner of the goods, baggage or articles appears on the records of the hotelkeeper or innkeeper, a copy of the published notice shall be mailed to the guest or owner at the address by registered or certified mail, postage prepaid, not less than ten (10) days prior to the date of the sale.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 710, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3717, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

34-33-2

.